src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
!! # Numerals
!  --------
!! This is a list of whatever was found in the dictionary.

!! **TODO** Make a systematic list

LEXICON num
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** just adds the tag **+Num**.
+Num: # ;

LEXICON Numerals
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splits layers of numerals in sublexca
1to9 ;
TENS ;
TEENS ;
numeralcompounds ;

LEXICON TEENS
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** where *dypansj-* is redirected to **1to9**.
dypansj- 1to9 ;

LEXICON 1to9
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains the basic numerals
jikk num "en, et, ei" ;
dy num "to" ;
trinn num "tre" ;
star num "fire" ;
pansj num "fem" ;
sinkus num "seks" ;
efta num "sju" ;
åkto num "åtte" ;

LEXICON TENS
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains 10, 20, .. 90.
dypansj num "ti" ;
snes TENSsplit  "tjue" ;
trinn-dypansj TENSsplit "tretti" ;
star-dypansj TENSsplit "førti" ;
pansj-lill TENSsplit "femti" ;
pansj-lill-dypansj TENSsplit "seksti" ;

LEXICON TENSsplit
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splits 20, ... 90 into 20 vs 21, 22, ...
num ; !!≈ * @CODE* here the tens go to +Num: snes, trinn-dypansj, ..
-å- 1to9 ;  !!≈ * @CODE* here the tens go to 1to9: snes-å-dy, trinn-dypansj-å-jikk, ..

!trinn-dypansj-å-jikk num "tretti-en" ; 
!snes-å-star num "tjue-fire" ;

LEXICON numeralcompounds
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** is a lexicon to be looked into.
dypansj-lill m2 "ti kroner" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
